sl-SI: Igrače in igre > Igrače > Lutke, igralni kompleti in figurice: Akcijske figurice in figurice za igranje; Bobblehead figurice; Dodatki za lutke in akcijske figurice; Dodatki za hišice za punčke; Hišice za punčke; Punčke; Papirnate in magnetne punčke; Dodatki za lutke in lutkovno gledališče; Lutkovna gledališča; Lutke in marionete; Plišaste živali; Igralni kompleti
nl: Speelgoed en spellen > Speelgoed > Poppen, speelsets en speelgoedfiguurtjes: Actie- en speelgoedfiguurtjes; Ja-knikkende figuurtjes; Accessoires voor poppen en actiefiguurtjes; Accessoires voor poppenhuizen; Poppenhuizen; Poppen; Papieren en magnetische aankleedpoppetjes; Accessoires voor poppenkastpoppen en poppenkasten; Poppenkasten; Handpoppen; Pluchen speelgoed; Speelsets
en: Toys & Games > Toys > Dolls, Playsets & Toy Figures: Action & Toy Figures; Bobblehead Figures; Doll & Action Figure Accessories; Dollhouse Accessories; Dollhouses; Dolls; Paper & Magnetic Dolls; Puppet & Puppet Theater Accessories; Puppet Theaters; Puppets & Marionettes; Stuffed Animals; Toy Playsets
el: Παιχνίδια > Παιχνίδια (Toys) > Κούκλες, σετ παιχνιδιών και φιγούρες: Φιγούρες δράσης & παιχνιδιών; Φιγούρες με κουνιστά κεφάλια; Αξεσουάρ για κούκλες & φιγούρες δράσης; Αξεσουάρ για κουκλόσπιτα; Κουκλόσπιτα; Κούκλες; Χάρτινες & μαγνητικές κούκλες; Αξεσουάρ μαριονέτας & κουκλοθεάτρου; Κουκλοθέατρα; Κούκλες & μαριονέτες; Λούτρινα ζωάκια; Σετ παιχνιδιών
ro-RO: Jucării și jocuri > Jucării > Păpuși, seturi de joacă și figurine de jucărie: Figurine și jucării; Figurine cu cap mobil; Accesorii pentru păpuși și figurine; Accesorii pentru case de păpuși; Case de păpuși; Păpuși; Păpuși de hârtie și magnetice; Accesorii pentru teatru de păpuși și păpuși de păpușar; Teatre de păpuși; Păpuși de păpușar și marionete; Animale de pluș; Seturi de jucării
pt-BR: Brinquedos e jogos > Brinquedos > Bonecas, conjuntos e personagens: Bonecos de personagem; Bobbleheads; Acessórios para bonecas e bonecos de personagens; Acessórios para casa de bonecas; Casas de boneca; Bonecas; Bonecas de papel e magnéticas; Acessórios para fantoches e teatros de fantoches; Teatros de fantoches; Fantoche e marionetes; Brinquedos de pelúcia; Conjuntos
ko: 장난감/게임 > 장난감 > 인형/인형놀이 세트/장난감 피겨: 액션/장난감 피겨; 버블헤드 피겨; 인형/액션 피겨 부대용품; 인형의 집 부대용품; 인형의 집; 인형; 종이/자석 인형; 인형/인형극 부대용품; 인형극; 퍼펫/마리오네트; 봉제 동물 인형; 장난감 놀이세트
it: Giochi e giocattoli > Giocattoli > Bambole, playset e giocattoli: Action figure; Figurine bobblehead; Accessori bambole e action figure; Accessori case bambole; Case delle bambole; Bambole; Bambole di carta e magnetiche; Accessori per burattini e teatro dei burattini; Teatri dei burattini; Pupazzetti; Orsacchiotti; Playset
ja: おもちゃ・ゲーム > おもちゃ > 人形・プレイセット: アクションフィギュア・トイフィギュア; 首振り人形; 人形・アクションフィギュア関連用品; ドールハウス関連用品; ドールハウス; 人形; 紙人形・磁石人形; 人形劇関連用品; 人形劇; あやつり人形・指人形; ぬいぐるみ; プレイセット
es: Juegos y juguetes > Juguetes > Muñecas, parques infantiles y figuras de juguete: Figuras de acción y de juguete; Muñecos con cabeza oscilante; Accesorios para muñecas y muñecos de acción; Accesorios para casas de muñecas; Casitas de muñecas; Muñecas; Muñecas magnéticas y de papel; Accesorios para teatro de títeres y marionetas; Teatros de títeres; Marionetas; Animales de peluche; Parques infantiles
bg-BG: Играчки и игри > Играчки > Кукли, комплекти за игра и фигурки: Игрални екшън фигурки; Фигури с клатещи се глави; Аксесоари за кукли и екшън фигурки; Аксесоари за къщи за кукли; Къщи за кукли; Кукли; Хартиени и магнитни кукли; Кукли и аксесоари за куклен театър; Куклени театри; Кукли и марионетки; Плюшени животни; Комплекти играчки
hu: Játékok és játékszerek > Játékok > Babák, játékkészletek és játékfigurák: Akció- és játékfigurák; Bobblehead-figurák; Baba- és akciófigura-kiegészítők; Babaház-kiegészítők; Babaházak; Babák; Papír- és mágneses babák; Báb- és bábszínházi kiegészítők; Bábszínházak; Bábok és marionettek; Kitömött állatok; Játékos játékkészletek
ru: Игрушки и игры > Игрушки > Куклы, фигурки и игровые наборы: Игрушечные фигурки; Фигурки с качающейся головой; Аксессуары для кукол и фигурок; Аксессуары для кукольных домиков; Кукольные домики; Куклы; Бумажные и магнитные куклы; Аксессуары для марионеток и кукольного театра; Кукольные театры; Марионетки; Мягкие игрушки-животные; Игровые наборы
lt-LT: Žaislai ir žaidimai > Žaislai > Lėlės, žaidimų rinkiniai ir žaislinės figūrėlės: Veiksmo ir žaislų figūrėlės; Figūrėlės linguojančia galva; Lėlių ir veiksmo figūrėlių priedai; Lėlių namelių priedai; Lėlių nameliai; Lėlės; Popierinės ir magnetinės lėlės; Lėlių ir lėlių teatrų priedai; Lėlių teatrai; Lėlės ir marionetės; Gyvūnų iškamšos; Žaislų rinkiniai
zh-CN: 玩具/游戏 > 玩具 > 玩偶与玩具套装: 活动玩偶/玩具玩偶; 摇头装饰玩偶; 人偶/手办/玩具娃娃配件; 玩具屋配件; 玩具屋; 玩偶; 纸/磁娃娃; 木偶/木偶台配件; 木偶台; 木偶; 毛绒动物; 场景玩具套装
cs: Hračky a hry > Hračky > Panenky, hrací sady a figurky: Akční a herní postavičky; Figurky s kývací hlavičkou; Panenky a figurky – příslušenství; Domečky pro panenky – příslušenství; Domečky pro panenky; Panenky; Papírové a magnetické panenky; Loutky a loutková divadla – příslušenství; Loutková divadla; Loutky; Plyšové hračky; Herní sady
da: Legetøj og spil > Legetøj > Dukker, legestativer og legetøjsfigurer: Action- og legetøjsfigurer; Nikkedukker; Dukker og actionfigurer – tilbehør; Dukkehuse – tilbehør; Dukkehuse; Dukker; Påklædningsdukker og magnetdukker; Marionetdukke og dukketeater – tilbehør; Dukketeatre; Dukker og marionetdukker; Tøjdyr; Legetøjssæt
tr: Oyuncaklar ve Oyunlar > Oyuncaklar > Bebekler, Oyun Setleri ve Oyuncak Figürler: Aksiyon ve Oyuncak Figürleri; Büyük Kafalı Figürler; Bebekler ve Aksiyon Figür Aksesuarları; Bebek Evi Aksesuarları; Bebek Evleri; Bebekler; Kağıt ve Mıknatıslı Bebekler; Kukla ve Kukla Tiyatrosu; Kukla Tiyatroları; Kuklalar; Dolgu Oyuncak Hayvanlar; Oyuncak Setleri
de: Spielzeuge & Spiele > Spielzeuge > Puppen, Spielkombinationen & Spielzeugfiguren: Action- & Spielzeugfiguren; Wackelfiguren; Zubehör für Puppen & Actionfiguren; Puppenhaus-Zubehör; Puppenhäuser; Puppen; Papier- & Magnetpuppen; Zubehör für Puppen & Puppentheater; Puppentheater; Marionetten; Stofftiere; Spielzeugsets
zh-TW: 玩具和遊戲 > 玩具 > 玩偶、套裝玩具組和公仔: 公仔; 大頭人像; 娃娃與公仔配件; 迷你娃娃屋配件; 迷你娃娃屋; 玩偶; 紙娃娃/磁鐵娃娃; 布袋戲偶/戲台配件; 布袋戲台; 布偶/木偶; 填充玩具; 玩具組
hr-HR: Igračke i igre > Igračke > Lutke, setovi za igru i figurice: Akcijske figure i igračke; Bobblehead figure; Dodaci za lutke i akcijske figure; Pribor za kućice za lutke; Kuće za lutke; Lutke; Papirnate i magnetske lutke; Lutke i dodaci za lutkarska kazališta; Kazališta lutaka; Lutke i marionete; Plišane igračke životinje; Setovi igračaka
sv: Leksaker och spel > Leksaker > Dockor, lekset och leksaksfigurer: Action- och leksaksfigurer; Bobbleheaddockor; Tillbehör till dockor och actionfigurer; Tillbehör till dockskåp; Dockskåp; Dockor; Pappers- och magnetiska dockor; Tillbehör till dockor och dockteatrar; Dockteatrar; Handdockor och marionetter; Mjukisdjur; Lekset
nb: Leker og spill > Leker > Dukker, lekesett og lekefigurer: Action- og lekefigurer; Boblehodefigurer; Tilbehør til dukker og actionfigurer; Tilbehør til dukkehus; Dukkehus; Dukker; Papir- og magnetdukker; Tilbehør til dukker og dukketeater; Dukketeatre; Dukker og marionetter; Kosedyr; Lekesett
th: ของเล่นและเกม > ของเล่น > ตุ๊กตา ชุดเล่น และหุ่นจำลอง: หุ่นแอคชันและของเล่น; ตุ๊กตาหัวเด้ง; อุปกรณ์สำหรับตุ๊กตาและแอคชัน ฟิกเกอร์; อุปกรณ์บ้านตุ๊กตา; บ้านตุ๊กตา; ตุ๊กตา; ตุ๊กตากระดาษและแม่เหล็ก; อุปกรณ์หุ่นเชิดและโรงละครสำหรับหุ่นเชิด; โรงละครสำหรับหุ่นเชิด; หุ่นกระบอกและหุ่นเชิด; ตุ๊กตาสัตว์ยัดนุ่น; ชุดของเล่น
pl: Gry i zabawki > Zabawki > Lalki, zestawy i figurki: Zabawki i figurki akcji; Figurki bobblehead; Akcesoria do lalek i figurek akcji; Akcesoria do domków dla lalek; Domki dla lalek; Lalki; Lalki papierowe i magnetyczne; Akcesoria do pacynek i teatrzyków; Teatrzyki; Pacynki i marionetki; Pluszaki; Zestawy zabawek
fr: Jeux et jouets > Jouets > Poupées, coffrets et figurines: Figurines jouets; Figurines à tête mobile; Accessoires pour poupées et figurines; Accessoires de maison de poupées; Maisons de poupées; Poupées; Poupées en papier et magnétiques; Accessoires pour théâtres de marionnettes et marionnettes; Théâtres de marionnettes; Marionnettes; Peluches; Sets de jeu
fi: Lelut ja pelit > Lelut > Nuket, leikkisetit ja leluhahmot: Toiminta- ja leluhahmot; Bobblehead-hahmot; Nukkejen toimintahahmojen lisätarvikkeet; Nukketalotarvikkeet; Nukketalot; Nuket; Paperi- ja magneettinuket; Käsinuket ja nukketeatteritarvikkeet; Nukketeatterit; Käsinuket ja marionetit; Pehmoeläimet; Lelusetit
vi: Đồ chơi & Trò chơi > Đồ chơi > Búp bê, Bộ đồ chơi & Mô hình đồ chơi: Mô hình động và mô hình đồ chơi; Mô hình nhân vật bobblehead; Phụ kiện búp bê & mô hình nhân vật; Phụ kiện nhà búp bê; Nhà búp bê; Búp bê; Búp bê giấy và búp bê từ; Phụ kiện con rối và rạp hát diễn rối; Rạp hát diễn rối; Con rối; Thú nhồi bông; Đồ chơi theo bộ
pt-PT: Brinquedos e jogos > Brinquedos > Bonecas, figuras e conjuntos de brincar: Brinquedos e figuras de ação; Figuras Bobblehead; Acessórios para bonecas e figuras de ação; Acessórios para casas de bonecas; Casas de bonecas; Bonecas; Bonecas de papel e magnéticas; Acessórios para fantoches e teatros de fantoches; Teatros de fantoches; Fantoches e marionetas; Animais de peluche; Conjuntos de brincar
sk-SK: Hračky a hry > Hračky > Bábiky, súpravy a figúrky na hranie: Akčné figúrky na hranie; Figúrky s veľkými hlavami; Príslušenstvo pre bábiky a akčné figúrky; Príslušenstvo k domčeku pre bábiky; Domčeky pre bábiky; Bábiky; Papierové a magnetické bábiky; Príslušenstvo pre bábky a bábkové divadielka; Bábkové divadielka; Bábky a marionety; Plyšové zvieratká; Hracie súpravy